California statutes. Commercial Code
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the changes to this division made by the act adding this chapter apply to a transaction or lien within its scope, even if the transaction or lien was entered into or created before July 1, 2014.

(b) The changes to this division made by the act adding this chapter do not affect an action, case, or proceeding commenced before July 1, 2014.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 531, Sec. 23.   (AB 502)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Operative July 1, 2014, by Sec. 28 of Ch. 531.)
-------------------------------------------

9803.

(a) A security interest that is a perfected security interest immediately before July 1, 2014, is a perfected security interest under this division as amended by this act if, as of July 1, 2014, the applicable requirements for attachment and perfection under this division as of that date are satisfied without further action.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in Section 9805, if, immediately before July 1, 2014, a security interest is a perfected security interest, but the applicable requirements for perfection under this division as of July 1, 2014, are not satisfied as of that date, the security interest remains perfected thereafter only if the applicable requirements for perfection under this division
 as amended by this act are satisfied by July 1, 2015.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 531, Sec. 23.   (AB 502)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Operative July 1, 2014, by Sec. 28 of Ch. 531.)
-------------------------------------------

9804.

A security interest that is an unperfected security interest immediately before July 1, 2014, becomes a perfected security interest as follows:

(a) Without further action, on July 1, 2014, if the applicable requirements for perfection under this division as amended by this act are satisfied before or at that time.

(b) When the applicable requirements for perfection are satisfied if the requirements are satisfied after that time.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 531, Sec. 23.   (AB 502)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Operative July 1, 2014, by Sec. 28 of Ch. 531.)
-------------------------------------------

9805.

(a) The filing of a financing statement before July 1, 2014, is effective to perfect a security interest to the extent the filing would satisfy the applicable requirements for perfection under this division as amended by this act.

(b) The changes to this division made by the act adding this chapter do not render ineffective an effective financing statement that, before July 1, 2014, is filed and satisfies the applicable requirements for perfection under the law of the jurisdiction governing perfection as provided in this division as it existed before that date. However, except as otherwise provided in subdivisions (c) and (d) and Section 9806, the financing statement ceases to be effective under the
 following conditions:

(1) If the financing statement is filed in this state, at the time the financing statement would have ceased to be effective had the changes to this division made by the act adding this chapter not become operative.

(2) If the financing statement is filed in another jurisdiction, at the earlier of the following:

(A) The time the financing statement would have ceased to be effective under the law of that jurisdiction.

(B) June 30, 2018.

(c) The filing of a continuation statement after July 1, 2014, does not continue the effectiveness of a financing statement filed before that date. However, upon the timely filing of a continuation statement after July 1, 2014, and in
 accordance with the law of the jurisdiction governing perfection as provided in this division, the effectiveness of a financing statement filed in the same office in that jurisdiction before July 1, 2014, continues for the period provided by the law of that jurisdiction.

(d) Subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) applies to a financing statement that, before July 1, 2014, is filed against a transmitting utility and satisfies the applicable requirements for perfection under the law of the jurisdiction governing perfection as provided in this division as it existed before that date, only to the extent that this division provides that the law of a jurisdiction other than the jurisdiction in which the financing statement is filed governs perfection of a security interest in collateral covered by the financing statement.

(e) A financing statement that includes a financing
 statement filed before July 1, 2014, and a continuation statement filed after that date is effective only to the extent that it satisfies the requirements of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 9501) as amended by the act adding this chapter for an initial financing statement. A financing statement that indicates that the debtor is a decedent’s estate indicates that the collateral is being administered by a personal representative within the meaning of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 9503, as amended by the act adding this chapter. A financing statement that indicates that the debtor is a trust or is a trustee acting with respect to property held in trust indicates that the collateral is held in a trust within the meaning of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 9503 as amended by the act adding this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 531, Sec. 23.   (AB 502)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Operative July 1, 2014, by Sec. 28 of Ch. 531.)
-------------------------------------------

9806.

(a) The filing of an initial financing statement in the office specified in Section 9501 continues the effectiveness of a financing statement filed before July 1, 2014, if the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The filing of an initial financing statement in that office would be effective to perfect a security interest under this division as amended by the act adding this chapter.

(2) The preeffective-date financing statement was filed in an office in another state.

(3) The initial financing statement satisfies subdivision (c).

(b) The filing of an initial financing statement under subdivision (a) continues the effectiveness of the preeffective-date financing statement if the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) If the initial financing statement is filed before July 1, 2014, for the period provided in Section 9515 prior to its amendment by the act adding this chapter with respect to an initial financing statement.

(2) If the initial financing statement is filed after July 1, 2014, for the period provided in Section 9515 as amended by the act adding this chapter with respect to an initial financing statement.

(c) To be effective for purposes of subdivision (a), an initial financing statement shall satisfy the following conditions:

(1) Satisfy the requirements of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 9501) as amended by the act adding this chapter for an initial financing statement.

(2) Identify the preeffective-date financing statement by indicating the office in which the financing statement was filed and providing the dates of filing and file numbers, if any, of the financing statement and of the most recent continuation statement filed with respect to the financing statement.

(3) Indicate that the preeffective-date financing statement remains effective.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 531, Sec. 23.   (AB 502)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Operative July 1, 2014, by Sec. 28 of Ch. 531.)
-------------------------------------------

9807.

(a) In this section, “preeffective-date financing statement” means a financing statement filed before July 1, 2014.

(b) After July 1, 2014, a person may add or delete collateral covered by, continue or terminate the effectiveness of, or otherwise amend the information provided in, a preeffective-date financing statement only in accordance with the law of the jurisdiction governing perfection as provided in this division as amended by the act adding this chapter. However, the effectiveness of a preeffective-date financing statement also may be terminated in accordance with the law of the jurisdiction in which the financing statement is filed.

(c) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (d), if the law of this state governs perfection of a security interest, the information in a preeffective-date financing statement may be amended after July 1, 2014, only if:

(1) The preeffective-date financing statement and an amendment are filed in the office specified in Section 9501.

(2) An amendment is filed in the office specified in Section 9501 concurrently with, or after the filing in that office of, an initial financing statement that satisfies subdivision (c) of Section 9806.

(3) An initial financing statement that provides the information as amended and satisfies subdivision (c) of Section 9806 is filed in the office specified in Section 9501.

(d) If the law of this state governs
 perfection of a security interest, the effectiveness of a preeffective-date financing statement may be continued only under subdivision (c) or (e) of Section 9805 or Section 9806.

(e) Whether or not the law of this state governs perfection of a security interest, the effectiveness of a preeffective-date financing statement filed in this state may be terminated after July 1, 2014, by filing a termination statement in the office in which the preeffective-date financing statement is filed, unless an initial financing statement that satisfies subdivision (c) of Section 9806 has been filed in the office specified by the law of the jurisdiction governing perfection as provided in this division as amended by the act adding this chapter as the office in which to file a financing statement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 531, Sec. 23.   (AB 502)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Operative July 1, 2014, by Sec. 28 of Ch. 531.)
-------------------------------------------

9808.

A person may file an initial financing statement or a continuation statement under this chapter if the following conditions are satisfied:

(a) The secured party of record authorizes the filing.

(b) The filing is necessary under this part to accomplish either of the following:

(1) To continue the effectiveness of a financing statement filed before July 1, 2014.

(2) To perfect or continue the perfection of a security interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 531, Sec. 23.   (AB 502)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Operative July 1, 2014, by Sec. 28 of Ch. 531.)
-------------------------------------------

9809.

The changes to this division made by the act adding this chapter determine the priority of conflicting claims to collateral. However, if the relative priorities of the claims were established before those changes become operative on July 1, 2014, this division as it existed before those changes become operative determines priority.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 531, Sec. 23.   (AB 502)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Operative July 1, 2014, by Sec. 28 of Ch. 531.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 9. Transition Provisions for 2014 Amendments [9901. - 9907.]

9901.

(a) The changes to this division made by the act adding this chapter become operative on January 1, 2015.

(b) This chapter applies to a security interest only to the extent that, with respect to such security interest, both of the following apply:

(1) A debtor is an individual.

(2) A financing statement filed before January 1, 2015, provides the name of an individual as a debtor.

(c) If a security interest is within the scope of Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 9801), that chapter
 continues to apply. To the extent there is a conflict between Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 9801) and this chapter, this chapter governs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 284, Sec. 2.   (AB 1858)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

9902.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the changes to this division made by the act adding this chapter apply to a transaction or lien within its scope, even if the transaction or lien was entered into or created before January 1, 2015.

(b) The changes to this division made by the act adding this chapter do not affect an action, case, or proceeding commenced before January 1, 2015.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 284, Sec. 2.   (AB 1858)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

9903.

A security interest that is a perfected security interest immediately before January 1, 2015, is a perfected security interest under this division as amended by this act if, as of January 1, 2015, the applicable requirements for attachment and perfection under this division as of that date are satisfied without further action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 284, Sec. 2.   (AB 1858)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

9904.

A security interest that is an unperfected security interest immediately before January 1, 2015, becomes a perfected security interest as follows:

(a) Without further action, on January 1, 2015, if the applicable requirements for perfection under this division as amended by this act are satisfied before or at that time.

(b) When the applicable requirements for perfection are satisfied if the requirements are satisfied after that time.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 284, Sec. 2.   (AB 1858)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

9905.

(a) The filing of a financing statement before January 1, 2015, is effective to perfect a security interest to the extent the filing would satisfy the applicable requirements for perfection under this division as amended by this act.

(b) The changes to this division made by the act adding this chapter do not render ineffective an effective financing statement that, before January 1, 2015, is filed and satisfies the applicable requirements for perfection under this division (including giving effect to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 9801)) as it existed before giving effect to the changes to this division made by the act adding this chapter. However, except as otherwise
 provided in subdivision (c), the financing statement ceases to be effective at the time the financing statement would have ceased to be effective had the changes to this division made by the act adding this chapter not become effective and operative.

(c) The timely filing of a continuation statement on or after January 1, 2015, continues the effectiveness of a financing statement filed before January 1, 2015, if the financing statement (including any amendments) contains the name of the debtor in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 9501) as amended by the act adding this chapter for an initial financing statement.

(d) A financing statement (including any amendments) that includes a financing statement filed before January 1, 2015, and a
 continuation statement filed after January 1, 2015, is effective only to the extent that they satisfy the requirements of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 9501) as amended by the act adding this chapter for an initial financing statement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 284, Sec. 2.   (AB 1858)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

9906.

A person may file an initial financing statement or a continuation statement under this chapter if the following conditions are satisfied:

(a) The secured party of record authorizes the filing.

(b) The filing is necessary under this division to accomplish either of the following:

(1) To continue the effectiveness of a financing statement filed before January 1, 2015.

(2) To perfect or continue the perfection of a security interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 284, Sec. 2.   (AB 1858)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

9907.

The changes to this division made by the act adding this chapter determine the priority of conflicting claims to the collateral. However, if the relative priorities of the claims were established before those changes become effective and operative on January 1, 2015, this division as it existed before those changes become effective and operative determines priority.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 284, Sec. 2.   (AB 1858)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 10. PERSONAL PROPERTY LEASES [10101. - 10600.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [10101. - 10107.]

10101.

This division shall be known and may be cited as the Uniform Commercial Code—Leases.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1359, Sec. 5.   Operative January 1, 1990, by Sec. 11 of Ch. 1359.)
-------------------------------------------

10102.

(a) This division applies to any transaction, regardless of form, that creates a lease and, in the case of a hybrid lease, it applies to the extent provided in subdivision (b).

(b) In a hybrid lease, the following rules apply:

(1) If the lease-of-goods aspects do not predominate, the following rules apply:

(A) Only the provisions of this division which relate primarily to the lease-of-goods aspects of the transaction apply, and the provisions that relate primarily to the transaction as a whole do not apply.

(B) Section 10209 applies if the lease is a finance lease.

(C) Section 10407 applies to the promises of the lessee in a finance lease to the extent the promises are consideration for the right to possession and use of the leased goods.

(2) If the lease-of-goods aspects predominate, this division applies to the transaction, but does not preclude application in appropriate circumstances of other law to aspects of the lease which do not relate to the lease of goods.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 74.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10103.

(a) In this division, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) “Buyer in ordinary course of business” means a person who, in good faith and without knowledge that the sale to it is in violation of the ownership rights or security interest or leasehold interest of a third party in the goods, buys in ordinary course from a person in the business of selling goods of that kind, but does not include a pawnbroker. “Buying” may be for cash or by exchange of other property or on secured or unsecured credit and includes acquiring goods or documents of title under a
 preexisting contract for sale but does not include a transfer in bulk or as security for or in total or partial satisfaction of a money debt.

(2) “Cancellation” occurs when either party puts an end to the lease contract for default by the other party.

(3) “Commercial unit” means such a unit of goods as by commercial usage is a single whole for purposes of lease and division of which materially impairs its character or value on the market or in use. A commercial unit may be a single article, as a machine, or a set of articles, as a suite of furniture or a line of machinery, or a quantity, as a gross or carload, or any other unit treated in use or in the relevant market as a single whole.

(4) “Conforming” goods or
 performance under a lease contract means goods or performance that are in accordance with the obligations under the lease contract.

(5) “Consumer lease” means a lease that a lessor regularly engaged in the business of leasing or selling makes to a lessee who is an individual and who takes under the lease primarily for a personal, family, or household purpose.

(6) “Fault” means wrongful act, omission, breach, or default.

(7) “Finance lease” means a lease with respect to which (A) the lessor does not select, manufacture, or supply the goods, (B) the lessor acquires the goods or the right to possession and use of the goods in connection with the lease, and (C) one of the following occurs:

(i) The lessee receives a copy of the contract by which the lessor acquired the goods or the right to possession and use of the goods before signing the lease contract.

(ii) The lessee’s approval of the contract by which the lessor acquired the goods or the right to possession and use of the goods is a condition to effectiveness of the lease contract.

(iii) The lessee, before signing the lease contract, receives an accurate and complete statement designating the promises and warranties, and any disclaimers of warranties, limitations or modifications of remedies, or liquidated damages, including those of a third party, such as the manufacturer of the goods, provided to the lessor by the person supplying the goods in connection
 with or as part of the contract by which the lessor acquired the goods or the right to possession and use of the goods.

(iv) The lessor, before the lessee signs the lease contract, informs the lessee in writing (aa) of the identity of the person supplying the goods to the lessor, unless the lessee has selected that person and directed the lessor to acquire the goods or the right to possession and use of the goods from that person, (bb) that the lessee is entitled under this division to the promises and warranties, including those of any third party, provided to the lessor by the person supplying the goods in connection with or as part of the contract by which the lessor acquired the goods or the right to possession and use of the goods, and (cc) that the lessee may communicate with the person supplying the goods to the lessor and
 receive an accurate and complete statement of those promises and warranties, including any disclaimers and limitations of them or of remedies.

(8) “Goods” means all things that are movable at the time of identification to the lease contract, or are fixtures (Section 10309), but the term does not include money, documents, instruments, accounts, chattel paper, general intangibles, or minerals or the like, including oil and gas, before extraction. The term also includes the unborn young of animals.

(9) “Installment lease contract” means a lease contract that authorizes or requires the delivery of goods in separate lots to be separately accepted, even though the lease contract contains a clause “each delivery is a separate lease” or its equivalent.

(10) “Lease” means a transfer of the right to possession and use of goods for a term in return for consideration, but a sale, including a sale on approval or a sale or return, or retention or creation of a security interest is not a lease. Unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the term includes a sublease.

(11) “Lease agreement” means the bargain, with respect to the lease, of the lessor and the lessee in fact as found in their language or by implication from other circumstances including course of dealing or usage of trade or course of performance as provided in this division. Unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the term includes a sublease agreement.

(12) “Lease contract” means the total legal obligation
 that results from the lease agreement as affected by this division and any other applicable rules of law. Unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the term includes a sublease contract.

(13) “Leasehold interest” means the interest of the lessor or the lessee under a lease contract.

(14) “Lessee” means a person who acquires the right to possession and use of goods under a lease. Unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the term includes a sublessee.

(15) “Lessee in ordinary course of business” means a person who, in good faith and without knowledge that the lease to it is in violation of the ownership rights or security interest or leasehold interest of a third party in the goods, leases in ordinary course
 from a person in the business of selling or leasing goods of that kind, but does not include a pawnbroker. “Leasing” may be for cash or by exchange of other property or on secured or unsecured credit and includes acquiring goods or documents of title under a preexisting lease contract but does not include a transfer in bulk or as security for or in total or partial satisfaction of a money debt.

(16) “Lessor” means a person who transfers the right to possession and use of goods under a lease. Unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the term includes a sublessor.

(17) “Lessor’s residual interest” means the lessor’s interest in the goods after expiration, termination, or cancellation of the lease contract.

(18) “Lien” means a charge against or interest in goods to secure payment of a debt or performance of an obligation, but the term does not include a security interest.

(19) “Lot” means a parcel or a single article that is the subject matter of a separate lease or delivery, whether or not it is sufficient to perform the lease contract.

(20) “Merchant lessee” means a lessee that is a merchant with respect to goods of the kind subject to the lease.

(21) “Present value” means the amount as of a date certain of one or more sums payable in the future, discounted to the date certain. The discount is determined by the interest rate specified by the parties if the rate was not manifestly unreasonable at the time the
 transaction was entered into; otherwise, the discount is determined by a commercially reasonable rate that takes into account the facts and circumstances of each case at the time the transaction was entered into.

(22) “Purchase” includes taking by sale, lease, mortgage, security interest, pledge, gift, or any other voluntary transaction creating an interest in goods.

(23) “Sublease” means a lease of goods the right to possession and use of which was acquired by the lessor as a lessee under an existing lease.

(24) “Supplier” means a person from whom a lessor buys or leases goods to be leased under a finance lease.

(25) “Supply contract” means a contract under
 which a lessor buys or leases goods to be leased.

(26) “Termination” occurs when either party pursuant to a power created by agreement or law puts an end to the lease contract otherwise than for default.

(27) “Hybrid lease” means a single transaction involving a lease of goods and any of the following:

(A) The provision of services.

(B) A sale of other goods.

(C) A sale, lease, or license of property other than goods.

(b) Other definitions applying to this division and the sections in which they appear are:

“Accessions.” Subdivision (a) of Section 10310.

“Construction mortgage.” Paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 10309.

“Encumbrance.” Paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 10309.

“Fixtures.” Paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 10309.

“Fixture filing.” Paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 10309.

“Purchase money lease.” Paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 10309.

(c) The following definitions in other divisions apply to this division:

“Account.” Paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 9102.

“Between merchants.” Subdivision (3) of Section 2104.

“Buyer.” Paragraph (a) of subdivision (1) of Section 2103.

“Chattel paper.” Paragraph (11) of subdivision (a) of Section 9102.

“Consumer goods.” Paragraph (23) of subdivision (a) of Section 9102.

“Document.” Paragraph (30) of subdivision (a) of Section 9102.

“Entrusting.” Subdivision (3) of Section 2403.

“General intangible.” Paragraph (42) of subdivision (a) of Section 9102.

“Instrument.” Paragraph (47) of subdivision (a) of Section 9102.

“Merchant.” Subdivision (1) of Section
 2104.

“Mortgage.” Paragraph (55) of subdivision (a) of Section 9102.

“Pursuant to commitment.” Paragraph (69) of subdivision (a) of Section 9102.

“Receipt of goods.” Paragraph (c) of subdivision (1) of Section 2103.

“Sale.” Subdivision (1) of Section 2106.

“Sale on approval.” Section 2326.

“Sale or return.” Section 2326.

“Seller.” Paragraph (d) of subdivision (1) of Section 2103.

(d) In addition, Division 1 contains general definitions and principles of construction and interpretation applicable throughout this
 division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 75.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10104.

(a) A lease, although subject to this division, is also subject to any applicable: 

(1) Certificate of title statute of this state, including the provisions of the Vehicle Code that require registration of a vehicle or boat and provisions of the Health and Safety Code that require registration of a mobilehome or commercial coach. 

(2) Certificate of title statute of another jurisdiction (Section 10105). 

(3) Consumer law of this state, both decisional and statutory, including, to the extent that they apply to a consumer lease transaction, Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 17200) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code, Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17500) of Part 3 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code, and Part 4 (commencing with Section 1725) of Division 3 of the Civil Code. 

(b) In case of conflict between this
 division, other than Section 10105, subdivision (c) of Section 10304, and subdivision (c) of Section 10305, and a law referred to in subdivision (a), that law controls.

(c) Failure to comply with an applicable law has only the effect specified therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 111, Sec. 4.   Effective July 15, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

10105.

Subject to the provisions of subdivision (c) of Section 10304 and subdivision (c) of Section 10305, with respect to goods covered by a certificate of title issued under a statute of this state or of another jurisdiction, compliance and the effect of compliance or noncompliance with a certificate of title statute are governed by the law (including the conflict of laws rules) of the jurisdiction issuing the certificate until the earlier of (1) surrender of the certificate, or (2) four months after the goods are removed from that jurisdiction and thereafter until a new certificate of title is issued by another jurisdiction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 111, Sec. 5.   Effective July 15, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

10106.

(a) If the law chosen by the parties to a consumer lease is that of a jurisdiction other than a jurisdiction in which the lessee resides at the time the lease agreement becomes enforceable or within 30 days thereafter, in which the goods are to be used, or in which the lease is executed by the lessee, the choice is not enforceable. 

(b) If the judicial forum chosen by the parties to a consumer lease is in a county other than the county in which the lessee in fact signed the lease, the county in which the lessee resides at the commencement of the action, the county in which the lessee resided at the time the lease contract became enforceable, or the county in which the goods are permanently stored, the choice is not enforceable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 111, Sec. 6.   Effective July 15, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

10107.

Any claim or right arising out of an alleged default or breach of warranty may be discharged in whole or in part without consideration by a waiver or renunciation in a signed record delivered by the aggrieved party.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 76.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Formation and Construction of Lease Contract [10201. - 10221.]

10201.

(a) A lease contract is not enforceable by way of action or defense unless:

(1) In a lease contract that is not a consumer lease, the total payments to be made under the lease contract, excluding payments for options to renew or buy, are less than one thousand dollars ($1,000); or

(2) There is a record, signed by the party against whom enforcement is sought or by that party’s authorized agent, sufficient to indicate that a lease contract has been made between the parties and to describe the goods leased and the lease term.

(b) Any description of leased goods or of the lease term is sufficient and satisfies paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), whether or not it is specific, if it reasonably identifies what is described.

(c) A record is not insufficient because it omits or incorrectly states a term agreed upon, but the lease contract is not enforceable under paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) beyond the lease term and the quantity of goods shown in the record.

(d) A lease contract that does not satisfy the requirements of subdivision (a), but which is valid in other respects, is enforceable:

(1) If the goods are to be specially manufactured or obtained for the lessee and are not suitable for lease or sale to others in the ordinary course of
 the lessor’s business, and the lessor, before notice of repudiation is received and under circumstances that reasonably indicate that the goods are for the lessee, has made either a substantial beginning of their manufacture or commitments for their procurement;

(2) If the party against whom enforcement is sought admits in that party’s pleading, testimony, or otherwise in court that a lease contract was made, but the lease contract is not enforceable under this provision beyond the quantity of goods admitted; or

(3) With respect to goods that have been received and accepted by the lessee.

(e) The lease term under a lease contract referred to in subdivision (d) is:

(1) If there is a record signed by the party against whom enforcement is sought or by that party’s authorized agent specifying the lease term, the term so specified;

(2) If the party against whom enforcement is sought admits in that party’s pleading, testimony, or otherwise in court a lease term, the term so admitted; or

(3) A reasonable lease term.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 77.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10202.

Terms with respect to which the confirmatory memoranda of the parties agree or which are otherwise set forth in a record intended by the parties as a final expression of their agreement with respect to such terms as are included therein may not be contradicted by evidence of any prior agreement or of a contemporaneous oral agreement but may be explained or supplemented:

(a) By course of dealing or usage of trade or by course of performance; and

(b) By evidence of consistent additional terms unless the court finds the record to have been intended also as a complete and exclusive statement of the
 terms of the agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 78.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10204.

(a) A lease contract may be made in any manner sufficient to show agreement, including conduct by both parties which recognizes the existence of a lease contract. 

(b) An agreement sufficient to constitute a lease contract may be found although the moment of its making is undetermined. 

(c) Although one or more terms are left open, a lease contract does not fail for indefiniteness if the parties have intended to make a lease contract and there is a reasonably certain basis for giving an appropriate remedy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 111, Sec. 8.   Effective July 15, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

10205.

An offer by a merchant to lease goods to or from another person in a signed record that by its terms gives assurance it will be held open is not revocable, for lack of consideration, during the time stated or, if no time is stated, for a reasonable time, but in no event may the period of irrevocability exceed three months. Any such term of assurance on a form supplied by the offeree must be separately signed by the offeror.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 79.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10206.

(a) Unless otherwise unambiguously indicated by the language or circumstances, an offer to make a lease contract must be construed as inviting acceptance in any manner and by any medium reasonable in the circumstances. 

(b) If the beginning of a requested performance is a reasonable mode of acceptance, an offeror who is not notified of acceptance within a reasonable time may treat the offer as having lapsed before acceptance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 111, Sec. 10.   Effective July 15, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

10208.

(a) An agreement modifying a lease contract needs no consideration to be binding.

(b) A signed lease agreement that excludes modification or rescission except by a signed record may not be otherwise modified or rescinded, but, except as between merchants, such a requirement on a form supplied by a merchant must be separately signed by the other party.

(c) Although an attempt at modification or rescission does not satisfy the requirements of subdivision (b), it may operate as a waiver.

(d) A party who has made a
 waiver affecting an executory portion of a lease contract may retract the waiver by reasonable notification received by the other party that strict performance will be required of any term waived, unless the retraction would be unjust in view of a material change of position in reliance on the waiver.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 80.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10209.

(a) The benefit of a supplier’s promises to the lessor under the supply contract and of all warranties, whether express or implied, including those of any third party provided in connection with or as part of the supply contract, extends to the lessee to the extent of the lessee’s leasehold interest under a finance lease related to the supply contract, but is subject to the terms of the warranty and of the supply contract and all defenses or claims arising therefrom. 

(b) The extension of the benefit of a supplier’s promises and of warranties to the lessee (subdivision (a) of Section 10209) does not: (1) modify the rights and obligations of the parties to the supply contract, whether arising therefrom or otherwise, or (2) impose any duty or liability under the supply contract on the lessee. 

(c) Any modification or rescission of the supply contract by the supplier and the lessor is effective between the supplier
 and the lessee unless, before the modification or rescission, the supplier has received notice that the lessee has entered into a finance lease related to the supply contract. If the modification or rescission is effective between the supplier and the lessee, the lessor is deemed to have assumed, in addition to the obligations of the lessor to the lessee under the lease contract, promises of the supplier to the lessor and warranties that were so modified or rescinded as they existed and were available to the lessee before modification or rescission. 

(d) In addition to the extension of the benefit of the supplier’s promises and of warranties to the lessee under subdivision (a), the lessee retains all rights that the lessee may have against the supplier which arise from an agreement between the lessee and the supplier or under other law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 111, Sec. 13.   Effective July 15, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

10210.

(a) Express warranties by the lessor are created as follows: 

(1) Any affirmation of fact or promise made by the lessor to the lessee which relates to the goods and becomes part of the basis of the bargain creates an express warranty that the goods will conform to the affirmation or promise. 

(2) Any description of the goods which is made part of the basis of the bargain creates an express warranty that the goods will conform to the description. 
